Wyoming, session 2025, HB0336.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 14-2-320 is created to read:

14-2-320. Voluntary termination of parental rights;
written acknowledgement.

(a) Any voluntary termination of parental rights,
whether through a petition or agreement, shall include a
written acknowledgement from the parent who is voluntarily
terminating parental rights that the termination of
HB0336

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0579
parental rights may not terminate, suspend or otherwise
affect any existing or future child support obligations.

(b) The acknowledgement required under subsection (a)
of this section shall be signed by the parent who is
voluntarily terminating their parental rights and shall be
made part of the official record in any proceeding related
to the termination.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
limit the ability of a court to modify, enforce or
terminate child support obligations in accordance with
applicable law.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0336